Hawaii statutes.
[§560:5-602] Sterilization of wards.
Persons who are wards and who have attained the age of eighteen years have the
legal right to be sterilized when at least thirty days, but not more than one
hundred eighty days, have passed following the entry of an order providing for
sterilization. In no event, however, shall wards be sterilized without court
approval in accordance with this part unless sterilization occurs as part of
emergency medical treatment. [L 1986, c 81, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next